Utah statutes.
23-17-6.   Commercial hunting area -- Registration -- Requirements for hunters.

(1) (a)  Any person desiring to operate a commercial hunting area within this state to permit the releasing and shooting of pen-raised birds may apply to the Wildlife Board for authorization to do so.

(b)  The Wildlife Board may issue the applicant a certificate of registration to operate a commercial hunting area in accordance with rules prescribed by the board.

(c)  The Wildlife Board may determine the number of commercial hunting areas that may be established in each county of the state.

(2)  Any certificate of registration issued under Subsection (1) shall specify the species of birds that the applicant may propagate, keep, and release for shooting on the area covered by the certificate of registration.  The applicant may charge a fee for harvesting these birds.

(3)(a)  Any person hunting within the state on any commercial hunting area must:

(i)  be at least 12 years old;

(ii)  possess proof of passing a division-approved hunter education course, if the person was born after December 31, 1965; and

(iii)  have the permission of the owner or operator of the commercial hunting area.

(b)  The operator of a commercial hunting area shall verify that each hunter on the commercial hunting area meets the requirements of Subsections (3)(a)(i) and (3)(a)(ii).

(4)  Hunting on commercial hunting areas shall be permitted only during the commercial hunting area season prescribed by the Wildlife Board.

